Washington statutes.
RCW 2.10.130

Retirement for disability allowance.

Upon a judge being retired for disability as provided in RCW 2.10.120, he or she shall receive from the fund an amount equal to one-half of his or her final average salary.

[ 2011 c 336 s 26; 1971 ex.s. c 267 s 13.]